Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-747
Diseased animals; order for destruction; notice; protest; examination.

Whenever any animal has been adjudged to be affected with any infectious, contagious, or otherwise transmissible disease, other than a disease for which specific legislation exists, and has been ordered killed, the owner or custodian thereof shall be notified of such finding and order. Within forty-eight hours thereafter, such owner or custodian may file a protest with the Department of Agriculture stating under oath that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief such animal is free from such infectious, contagious, or otherwise transmissible disease. Thereupon, an examination of the animal involved shall be made by three veterinarians, graduates of a college of veterinary medicine which has been approved by the Department of Health and Human Services as a preliminary qualification for admission to practice veterinary medicine in the state. One of such veterinarians shall be appointed by the department, one by the person making such protest, and the two thus appointed shall choose the third. In case all three veterinarians or any two of them find such animal to be free from such infectious, contagious, or otherwise transmissible disease, the expense of such examination shall be paid by the state. In case the three veterinarians or any two of them find such animal to be affected with such infectious, contagious, or otherwise transmissible disease, the expense of the examination shall be paid by the person making the protest. The department and the person making such protest shall be bound by the result of such examination.

Laws 1927, c. 12, art. VIII, § 6, p. 93;

C.S.1929, § 54-943;

R.S.1943, § 54-747;

Laws 1969, c. 451, § 2, p. 1537;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 279;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 226.